Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3559.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 150A.01, subdivision 6a, is amended to read: Subd. 6a. Faculty dentist. "Faculty dentist" means a person who is licensed to practice dentistry as a faculty member of a deleted text begin school of dentistrydeleted text end new text begin dental education programnew text end , pursuant to section 150A.06, subdivision 1a. Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 150A.05, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Practice of dentistry. A person shall be deemed to be practicing dentistry within the meaning of sections 150A.01 to 150A.12: (1) who uses a dental degree, or designation, or card, device, directory, sign, or other media whereby the person represents an ability to diagnose, treat, prescribe, or operate for any disease, pain, deformity, deficiency, injury, or physical condition of the human tooth, teeth, alveolar process, gums or jaw, or adjacent or associated structures; (2) who is a manager, proprietor, operator or conductor of a place where dental operations are performed; (3) who performs dental operations of any kind gratuitously, or for a fee, gift, compensation or reward, paid or to be paid, to any person or agency; (4) who uses a roentgen or x-ray machine for dental treatment, roentgenograms or for dental diagnostic purposes; (5) who extracts a human tooth or teeth, or corrects or attempts to correct malpositions of the human teeth or jaws; (6) who offers and undertakes, by any means or method, to diagnose, treat or remove stains or accretions from human teeth or jaws; (7) who takes impressions of the human tooth, teeth, or jaws or performs any phase of any operation incident to the replacement of a part of a tooth, a tooth, teeth or associated tissues by means of a filling, a crown, a bridge, a denture or other appliance; (8) who furnishes, supplies, constructs, reproduces, repairs, or offers to furnish, supply, construct, reproduce or repair prosthetic dentures or plates, bridges or other substitutes for natural teeth, to the user or prospective user thereof; or (9) who performs any clinical operation included in the curricula of recognized dental deleted text begin schools and collegesdeleted text end new text begin education programsnew text end . Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 150A.05, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Exemptions and exceptions of certain practices and operations. Sections 150A.01 to 150A.12 do not apply to: (1) the practice of dentistry or dental hygiene in any branch of the armed services of the United States, the United States Public Health Service, or the United States Veterans Administration; (2) the practice of dentistry, dental hygiene, or dental assisting by undergraduate dental students, dental therapy students, dental hygiene students, and dental assisting students of the University of Minnesotadeleted text begin , schools of dentistrydeleted text end new text begin or dental or allied dental education programsnew text end that are accredited by the Commission on Dental Accreditation (CODA), deleted text begin schools of dental hygiene, schools with a dental therapy education program, or schools of dental assisting approved by the board,deleted text end when acting under the indirect supervision of a Minnesota licensed dentist and under the instruction of a licensed dentist, licensed dental therapist, licensed dental hygienist, or licensed dental assistant; (3) the practice of dentistry by licensed dentists of other states or countries while appearing as clinicians under the auspices of a duly approved dental deleted text begin school or collegedeleted text end new text begin education programnew text end , or a reputable dental society, or a reputable dental study club composed of dentists; (4) the actions of persons while they are taking examinations for licensure administered or approved by the board pursuant to sections 150A.03, subdivision 1, and 150A.06, subdivisions 1, 2, and 2a; (5) the practice of dentistry by dentists and dental hygienists licensed by other states during their functioning as examiners responsible for conducting licensure examinations administered by regional and national testing agencies with whom the board is authorized to affiliate and participate under section 150A.03, subdivision 1, and the practice of dentistry by the regional and national testing agencies during their administering examinations pursuant to section 150A.03, subdivision 1; (6) the use of x-rays or other diagnostic imaging modalities for making radiographs or other similar records in a hospital under the supervision of a physician or dentist or by a person who is credentialed to use diagnostic imaging modalities or x-ray machines for dental treatment, roentgenograms, or dental diagnostic purposes by a credentialing agency other than the Board of Dentistry; or (7) the service, other than service performed directly upon the person of a patient, of constructing, altering, repairing, or duplicating any denture, partial denture, crown, bridge, splint, orthodontic, prosthetic, or other dental appliance, when performed according to a written work order from a licensed dentist or a licensed advanced dental therapist in accordance with section 150A.10, subdivision 3. Sec. 4. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 150A.06, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Dentists. A person of good moral character who has graduated from a dental new text begin education new text end program accredited by the Commission on Dental Accreditation, having submitted an application and fee as prescribed by the board, may be examined by the board or by an agency pursuant to section 150A.03, subdivision 1, in a manner to test the applicant's fitness to practice dentistry. A graduate of a dental deleted text begin collegedeleted text end new text begin education programnew text end in another country must not be disqualified from examination solely because of the applicant's foreign training if the board determines that the training is equivalent to or higher than that provided by a dental deleted text begin collegedeleted text end new text begin education programnew text end accredited by the Commission on Dental Accreditation. In the case of examinations conducted pursuant to section 150A.03, subdivision 1, applicants shall take the examination prior to applying to the board for licensure. The examination shall include an examination of the applicant's knowledge of the laws of Minnesota relating to dentistry and the rules of the board. An applicant is ineligible to retake the clinical examination required by the board after failing it twice until further education and training are obtained as specified by the board by rule. A separate, nonrefundable fee may be charged for each time a person applies. An applicant who passes the examination in compliance with subdivision 2b, abides by professional ethical conduct requirements, and meets all other requirements of the board shall be licensed to practice dentistry and granted a general dentist license by the board. Sec. 5. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 150A.06, subdivision 1a, is amended to read: Subd. 1a. Faculty dentists. (a) Faculty members of a deleted text begin school of dentistrydeleted text end new text begin dental education programnew text end must be licensed in order to practice dentistry as defined in section 150A.05. The board may issue to members of the faculty of a deleted text begin school of dentistrydeleted text end new text begin dental education programnew text end a license designated as either a "limited faculty license" or a "full faculty license" entitling the holder to practice dentistry within the terms described in paragraph (b) or (c). The dean of a deleted text begin school of dentistrydeleted text end new text begin dental education program new text end and program directors of a Minnesota dental hygiene or dental assisting deleted text begin schooldeleted text end new text begin education programnew text end accredited by the Commission on Dental Accreditation shall certify to the board those members of the deleted text begin school'sdeleted text end new text begin education programnew text end faculty who practice dentistry but are not licensed to practice dentistry in Minnesota. A faculty member who practices dentistry as defined in section 150A.05, before beginning duties in a deleted text begin school of dentistry or a dental hygiene or dental assisting schooldeleted text end new text begin dental or allied dental education programnew text end , shall apply to the board for a limited or full faculty license. Pursuant to Minnesota Rules, chapter 3100, and at the discretion of the board, a limited faculty license must be renewed annually and a full faculty license must be renewed biennially. The faculty applicant shall pay a nonrefundable fee set by the board for issuing and renewing the faculty license. The faculty license is valid during the time the holder remains a member of the faculty of a deleted text begin school of dentistry or a dental hygiene or dental assisting schooldeleted text end new text begin dental or allied dental education programnew text end and subjects the holder to this chapter. (b) The board may issue to dentist members of the faculty deleted text begin ofdeleted text end new text begin teaching innew text end a Minnesota deleted text begin school of dentistry, dental hygiene, or dental assistingdeleted text end new text begin dental or allied dental education program new text end accredited by the Commission on Dental Accreditation, a license designated as a limited faculty license entitling the holder to practice dentistry within the deleted text begin schooldeleted text end new text begin education programnew text end and its affiliated teaching facilities, but only for the purposes of teaching or conducting research. The practice of dentistry at deleted text begin a schooldeleted text end new text begin an education programnew text end facility for purposes other than teaching or research is not allowed unless the dentist was a faculty member on August 1, 1993. (c) The board may issue to dentist members of the faculty deleted text begin ofdeleted text end new text begin teaching innew text end a Minnesota deleted text begin school of dentistry, dental hygiene, or dental assistingdeleted text end new text begin dental or allied dental education program new text end accredited by the Commission on Dental Accreditation a license designated as a full faculty license entitling the holder to practice dentistry within the deleted text begin schooldeleted text end new text begin education programnew text end and its affiliated teaching facilities and elsewhere if the holder of the license is employed 50 percent time or more by the deleted text begin schooldeleted text end new text begin education programnew text end in the practice of teaching or research, and upon successful review by the board of the applicant's qualifications as described in subdivisions 1, 1c, and 4 and board rule. The board, at its discretion, may waive specific licensing prerequisites. Sec. 6. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 150A.06, subdivision 1b, is amended to read: Subd. 1b. Resident dentists. A person who is a graduate of a dental deleted text begin schooldeleted text end new text begin education programnew text end and is an enrolled graduate student or student of an accredited advanced dental education program and who is not licensed to practice dentistry in the state shall obtain from the board a license to practice dentistry as a resident dentist. The license must be designated "resident dentist license" and authorizes the licensee to practice dentistry only under the supervision of a licensed dentist. A University of Minnesota School of Dentistry dental resident holding a resident dentist license is eligible for enrollment in medical assistance, as provided under section 256B.0625, subdivision 9b. A resident dentist license must be renewed annually pursuant to the board's rules. An applicant for a resident dentist license shall pay a nonrefundable fee set by the board for issuing and renewing the license. The requirements of sections 150A.01 to 150A.21 apply to resident dentists except as specified in rules adopted by the board. A resident dentist license does not qualify a person for licensure under subdivision 1. Sec. 7. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 150A.06, subdivision 1c, is amended to read: Subd. 1c. Specialty dentists. (a) The board may grant one or more specialty licenses in the specialty areas of dentistry that are recognized by the new text begin National new text end Commission onnew text begin Recognition ofnew text end Dental deleted text begin Accreditationdeleted text end new text begin Specialties and Certifying Board (National Commission)new text end . (b) An applicant for a specialty license shall: (1) have successfully completed a postdoctoral specialty new text begin education new text end program accredited by the Commission on Dental Accreditation, or have announced a limitation of practice before 1967; (2) have been certified by a specialty board approved by the Minnesota Board of Dentistry, or provide evidence of having passed a clinical examination for licensure required for practice in any state or Canadian province, or in the case of oral and maxillofacial surgeons only, have a Minnesota medical license in good standing; (3) have been in active practice or a postdoctoral specialty education program or United States government service at least 2,000 hours in the 36 months prior to applying for a specialty license; deleted text begin (4) if requested by the board, be interviewed by a committee of the board, which may include the assistance of specialists in the evaluation process, and satisfactorily respond to questions designed to determine the applicant's knowledge of dental subjects and ability to practice; deleted text end deleted text begin (5) if requested by the board, present complete records on a sample of patients treated by the applicant. The sample must be drawn from patients treated by the applicant during the 36 months preceding the date of application. The number of records shall be established by the board. The records shall be reasonably representative of the treatment typically provided by the applicant for each specialty area; deleted text end deleted text begin (6) at board discretion, pass a board-approved English proficiency test if English is not the applicant's primary language; deleted text end deleted text begin (7)deleted text end new text begin (4) new text end pass all components of the National Board Dental Examinations; deleted text begin (8)deleted text end new text begin (5) new text end pass the Minnesota Board of Dentistry jurisprudence examination; deleted text begin (9)deleted text end new text begin (6) new text end abide by professional ethical conduct requirements; and deleted text begin (10)deleted text end new text begin (7) new text end meet all other requirements prescribed by the Board of Dentistry. (c) The application must include: (1) a completed application furnished by the board; (2) a nonrefundable fee; and (3) a copy of the applicant's government-issued photo identification card. (d) A specialty dentist holding one or more specialty licenses is limited to practicing in the dentist's designated specialty area or areas. The scope of practice must be defined by each national specialty board recognized by the new text begin National new text end Commission deleted text begin on Dental Accreditationdeleted text end . (e) All specialty dentists who have fulfilled the specialty dentist requirements and who intend to limit their practice to a particular specialty area or areas may apply for one or more specialty licenses. Sec. 8. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 150A.06, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Dental hygienists. A person of good moral character, who has graduated from a dental hygiene new text begin education new text end program accredited by the Commission on Dental Accreditation and established in an institution accredited by an agency recognized by the United States Department of Education to offer college-level programs, may apply for licensure. The dental hygiene new text begin education new text end program must provide a minimum of two academic years of dental hygiene education. The applicant must submit an application and fee as prescribed by the board and a diploma or certificate of dental hygiene. Prior to being licensed, the applicant must pass the National Board of Dental Hygiene examination and a board approved examination designed to determine the applicant's clinical competency. In the case of examinations conducted pursuant to section 150A.03, subdivision 1, applicants shall take the examination before applying to the board for licensure. The applicant must also pass an examination testing the applicant's knowledge of the laws of Minnesota relating to the practice of dentistry and of the rules of the board. An applicant is ineligible to retake the clinical examination required by the board after failing it twice until further education and training are obtained as specified by board rule. A separate, nonrefundable fee may be charged for each time a person applies. An applicant who passes the examination in compliance with subdivision 2b, abides by professional ethical conduct requirements, and meets all the other requirements of the board shall be licensed as a dental hygienist. Sec. 9. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 150A.06, subdivision 2a, is amended to read: Subd. 2a. Licensed dental assistant. A person of good moral character, who has graduated from a dental assisting new text begin education new text end program accredited by the Commission on Dental Accreditation, may apply for licensure. The applicant must submit an application and fee as prescribed by the board and the diploma or certificate of dental assisting. In the case of examinations conducted pursuant to section 150A.03, subdivision 1, applicants shall take the examination before applying to the board for licensure. The examination shall include an examination of the applicant's knowledge of the laws of Minnesota relating to dentistry and the rules of the board. deleted text begin An applicant is ineligible to retake the licensure examination required by the board after failing it twice until further education and training are obtained as specified by board rule.deleted text end A separate, nonrefundable fee may be charged for each time a person applies. An applicant who passes the examination in compliance with subdivision 2b, abides by professional ethical conduct requirements, and meets all the other requirements of the board shall be licensed as a dental assistant. Sec. 10. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 150A.06, subdivision 2c, is amended to read: Subd. 2c. Guest license. (a) The board shall grant a guest license to practice as a dentist, new text begin dental therapist, new text end dental hygienist, or licensed dental assistant if the following conditions are met: (1) the dentist, new text begin dental therapist, new text end dental hygienist, or dental assistant is currently licensed in good standing in another United States jurisdiction; (2) the dentist, new text begin dental therapist, new text end dental hygienist, or dental assistant is currently engaged in the practice of that person's respective profession in another United States jurisdiction; (3) the dentist, new text begin dental therapist, new text end dental hygienist, or dental assistant will limit that person's practice to a public health setting in Minnesota that (i) is approved by the board; (ii) was established by a nonprofit organization that is tax exempt under chapter 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986; and (iii) provides dental care to patients who have difficulty accessing dental care; (4) the dentist,new text begin dental therapist,new text end dental hygienist, or dental assistant agrees to treat indigent patients who meet the eligibility criteria established by the clinic; and (5) the dentist, new text begin dental therapist, new text end dental hygienist, or dental assistant has applied to the board for a guest license and has paid a nonrefundable license fee to the board. (b) A guest license must be renewed annually with the board and an annual renewal fee must be paid to the board. Guest licenses expire on December 31 of each year. (c) A dentist, new text begin dental therapist, new text end dental hygienist, or dental assistant practicing under a guest license under this subdivision shall have the same obligations as a dentist, new text begin dental therapist, new text end dental hygienist, or dental assistant who is licensed in Minnesota and shall be subject to the laws and rules of Minnesota and the regulatory authority of the board. If the board suspends or revokes the guest license of, or otherwise disciplines, a dentist, new text begin dental therapist, new text end dental hygienist, or dental assistant practicing under this subdivision, the board shall promptly report such disciplinary action to the dentist's, new text begin dental therapist's, new text end dental hygienist's, or dental assistant's regulatory board in the jurisdictions in which they are licensed. (d) The board may grant a guest license to a dentist, new text begin dental therapist, new text end dental hygienist, or dental assistant licensed in another United States jurisdiction to provide dental care to patients on a voluntary basis without compensation for a limited period of time. The board shall not assess a fee for the guest license for volunteer services issued under this paragraph. (e) The board shall issue a guest license for volunteer services if: (1) the board determines that the applicant's services will provide dental care to patients who have difficulty accessing dental care; (2) the care will be provided without compensation; and (3) the applicant provides adequate proof of the status of all licenses to practice in other jurisdictions. The board may require such proof on an application form developed by the board. (f) The guest license for volunteer services shall limit the licensee to providing dental care services for a period of time not to exceed ten days in a calendar year. Guest licenses expire on December 31 of each year. (g) The holder of a guest license for volunteer services shall be subject to state laws and rules regarding dentistry and the regulatory authority of the board. The board may revoke the license of a dentist, new text begin dental therapist, new text end dental hygienist, or dental assistant practicing under this subdivision or take other regulatory action against the dentist,new text begin dental therapist,new text end dental hygienist, or dental assistant. If an action is taken, the board shall report the action to the regulatory board of those jurisdictions where an active license is held by the dentist, new text begin dental therapist, new text end dental hygienist, or dental assistant. Sec. 11. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 150A.06, subdivision 2d, is amended to read: Subd. 2d. Continuing education and professional development waiver. (a) The board shall grant a waiver to the continuing education requirements under this chapter for a licensed dentist, licensed dental therapist, licensed dental hygienist, or licensed dental assistant who documents to the satisfaction of the board that the dentist, dental therapist, dental hygienist, or licensed dental assistant has retired from active practice in the state and limits the provision of dental care services to those offered without compensation in a public health, community, or tribal clinic or a nonprofit organization that provides services to deleted text begin the indigent or to recipients of medical assistance or MinnesotaCare programsdeleted text end new text begin patients who do not have dental health coverage, either through a state public health care program or private insurance, and whose annual family gross income is equal to or less than 200 percent of the federal poverty guidelinesnew text end . (b) The board may require written documentation from the volunteer and retired dentist, dental therapist, dental hygienist, or licensed dental assistant prior to granting this waiver. (c) The board shall require the volunteer and retired dentist, dental therapist, dental hygienist, or licensed dental assistant to meet the following requirements: (1) a licensee seeking a waiver under this subdivision must complete and document at least five hours of approved courses in infection control, medical emergencies, and medical management for the continuing education cycle; and (2) provide documentation of current CPR certification deleted text begin from completion of the American Heart Association healthcare provider course or the American Red Cross professional rescuer coursedeleted text end . Sec. 12. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 150A.06, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Waiver of examination. (a) All or any part of the examination for dentists, dental therapists, dental hygienists, or dental assistants, except that pertaining to the law of Minnesota relating to dentistry and the rules of the board, may, at the discretion of the board, be waived for an applicant who presents a certificate of having passed all components of the National Board Dental Examinations or evidence of having maintained an adequate scholastic standing as determined by the board. (b) The board shall waive the clinical examination required for licensure for any dentist applicant who is a graduate of a dental deleted text begin schooldeleted text end new text begin education programnew text end accredited by the Commission on Dental Accreditation, who has passed all components of the National Board Dental Examinations, and who has satisfactorily completed a postdoctoral general dentistry residency program (GPR) or an advanced education in general dentistry (AEGD) program after January 1, 2004. The postdoctoral program must be accredited by the Commission on Dental Accreditation, be of at least one year's duration, and include an outcome assessment evaluation assessing the resident's competence to practice dentistry. The board may require the applicant to submit any information deemed necessary by the board to determine whether the waiver is applicable. Sec. 13. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 150A.06, subdivision 8, is amended to read: Subd. 8. Licensure by credentials; dental assistant. (a) Any dental assistant may, upon application and payment of a fee established by the board, apply for licensure based on an evaluation of the applicant's education, experience, and performance record in lieu of completing a board-approved dental assisting new text begin education new text end program for expanded functions as defined in rule, and may be interviewed by the board to determine if the applicant: (1) has graduated from deleted text begin an accrediteddeleted text end new text begin anew text end dental assisting new text begin education new text end program accredited by the Commission on Dental Accreditation or is currently certified by the Dental Assisting National Board; (2) is not subject to any pending or final disciplinary action in another state or Canadian province, or if not currently certified or registered, previously had a certification or registration in another state or Canadian province in good standing that was not subject to any final or pending disciplinary action at the time of surrender; (3) is of good moral character and abides by professional ethical conduct requirements; (4) at board discretion, has passed a board-approved English proficiency test if English is not the applicant's primary language; and (5) has met all expanded functions curriculum equivalency requirements of a Minnesota board-approved dental assisting new text begin education new text end program. (b) The board, at its discretion, may waive specific licensure requirements in paragraph (a). (c) An applicant who fulfills the conditions of this subdivision and demonstrates the minimum knowledge in dental subjects required for licensure under subdivision 2a must be licensed to practice the applicant's profession. (d) If the applicant does not demonstrate the minimum knowledge in dental subjects required for licensure under subdivision 2a, the application must be denied. If licensure is denied, the board may notify the applicant of any specific remedy that the applicant could take which, when passed, would qualify the applicant for licensure. A denial does not prohibit the applicant from applying for licensure under subdivision 2a. (e) A candidate whose application has been denied may appeal the decision to the board according to subdivision 4a. Sec. 14. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 150A.06, subdivision 9, is amended to read: Subd. 9. Graduates of nonaccredited dental new text begin education new text end programs. A graduate of a nonaccredited dental new text begin education new text end program who successfully completes the clinical licensure examination, and meets all other applicant requirements of the board shall be licensed to practice dentistry and granted a limited general dentist license by the board. The board shall place limitations on the licensee's authority to practice by requiring the licensee to practice under the general supervision of a Minnesota-licensed dentist approved by the board. A person licensed under this subdivision must practice for three consecutive years in Minnesota pursuant to a written agreement, approved by the board, between the licensee and a Minnesota-licensed dentist who may limit the types of services authorized. At the conclusion of the three-year period, the board shall grant an unlimited license without further restrictions if all supervising dentists who had entered into written agreements with the licensee during any part of the three-year period recommend unlimited licensure, and if no corrective action or disciplinary action has been taken by the board against the licensee. Sec. 15. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 150A.06, subdivision 11, is amended to read: Subd. 11. Emeritus active licensure. (a) A person licensed to practice dentistry, dental therapy, dental hygiene, or dental assisting may apply for an emeritus active license if the person is retired from active practice, is in compliance with board requirements, and is not the subject of current disciplinary action resulting in suspension, revocation, disqualification, condition, or restriction of the license to practice dentistry, dental therapy, dental hygiene, or dental assisting. (b) An emeritus active licensee may engage only in the following types of practice: (1) pro bono or volunteer dental practice; (2) paid practice not to exceed 500 hours per calendar year for the exclusive purpose of providing licensing supervision to meet the board's requirements; or (3) paid consulting services not to exceed 500 hours per calendar year. (c) An emeritus active licensee shall not hold out as a full licensee and may only hold out as authorized to practice as described in this subdivision. The board may take disciplinary or corrective action against an emeritus active licensee based on violations of applicable law or board requirements. (d) A person may apply for an emeritus active license by completing an application form specified by the board and must pay the application fee pursuant to section 150A.091, subdivision 20. (e) If an emeritus active license is not renewed every two years, the license expiresnew text begin 30 days after notification from the board that the licensee failed to timely renew the licensenew text end . The renewal date is the same as the licensee's renewal date when the licensee was in active practice. In order to renew an emeritus active license, the licensee must: (1) complete an application form as specified by the board; (2) pay the required renewal fee pursuant to section 150A.091, subdivision 20; and deleted text begin (3) report at least 25 continuing education hours completed since the last renewal, which must include: deleted text end deleted text begin (i) at least one hour in two different required CORE areas; deleted text end deleted text begin (ii) at least one hour of mandatory infection control; deleted text end deleted text begin (iii) for dentists and dental therapists, at least 15 hours of fundamental credits for dentists and dental therapists, and for dental hygienists and dental assistants, at least seven hours of fundamental credits; and deleted text end deleted text begin (iv) for dentists and dental therapists, no more than ten elective credits, and for dental hygienists and dental assistants, no more than six elective credits. deleted text end new text begin (3) comply with the professional development requirements in Minnesota Rules, part 3100.1350, subpart 4. new text end Sec. 16. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 150A.06, subdivision 12, is amended to read: Subd. 12. Licensure by credentials; dental therapist. (a) Any dental therapist may, upon application and payment of a fee established by the board, apply for licensure based on an evaluation of the applicant's education, experience, and performance record. The applicant may be interviewed by the board to determine if the applicant: (1) graduated with a baccalaureate or master's degree from a dental therapy new text begin education new text end program accredited by the Commission on Dental Accreditation; (2) provided evidence of successfully completing the board's jurisprudence examination; (3) actively practiced at least 2,000 hours within 36 months of the application date or passed a board-approved reentry program within 36 months of the application date; (4) either: (i) is currently licensed in another state or Canadian province and not subject to any pending or final disciplinary action; or (ii) was previously licensed in another state or Canadian province in good standing and not subject to any final or pending disciplinary action at the time of surrender; (5) passed a board-approved English proficiency test if English is not the applicant's primary language required at the board's discretion; and (6) met all curriculum equivalency requirements regarding dental therapy scope of practice in Minnesota. (b) The 2,000 practice hours required by paragraph (a), clause (3), may count toward the 2,000 practice hours required for consideration for advanced dental therapy certification, provided that all other requirements of section 150A.106, subdivision 1, are met. (c) The board, at its discretion, may waive specific licensure requirements in paragraph (a). (d) The board must license an applicant who fulfills the conditions of this subdivision and demonstrates the minimum knowledge in dental subjects required for licensure under subdivision 1d to practice the applicant's profession. (e) The board must deny the application if the applicant does not demonstrate the minimum knowledge in dental subjects required for licensure under subdivision 1d. If licensure is denied, the board may notify the applicant of any specific remedy the applicant could take to qualify for licensure. A denial does not prohibit the applicant from applying for licensure under subdivision 1d. (f) A candidate may appeal a denied application to the board according to subdivision 4a. Sec. 17. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 150A.08, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Grounds. The board may refuse or by order suspend or revoke, limit or modify by imposing conditions it deems necessary, the license of a dentist, dental therapist, dental hygienist, or dental assistant upon any of the following grounds: (1) fraud or deception in connection with the practice of dentistry or the securing of a license certificate; new text begin (2) conviction, including a finding or verdict of guilt, an admission of guilt, or a no contest plea, in any court of a felony-level criminal sexual conduct offense pursuant to sections 609.342 to 609.345 or similar statutes in another jurisdiction, as evidenced by public court records. A license that has been denied or revoked pursuant to this clause is not subject to chapter 364; new text end deleted text begin (2)deleted text end new text begin (3)new text end conviction, including a finding or verdict of guilt, an admission of guilt, or a no contest plea, in any court of a felony or gross misdemeanor reasonably related to the practice of dentistry as evidenced by deleted text begin a certified copy of the convictiondeleted text end new text begin public court recordsnew text end ; deleted text begin (3)deleted text end new text begin (4)new text end conviction, including a finding or verdict of guilt, an admission of guilt, or a no contest plea, in any court of an offense involving moral turpitude as evidenced by deleted text begin a certified copy of the convictiondeleted text end new text begin public court recordsnew text end ; deleted text begin (4) habitual overindulgence in the use of intoxicating liquors; deleted text end (5) improper or unauthorized prescription, dispensing, administering, or personal or other use of any legend drug as defined in chapter 151, of any chemical as defined in chapter 151, or of any controlled substance as defined in chapter 152; (6) conduct unbecoming a person licensed to practice dentistry, dental therapy, dental hygiene, or dental assisting, or conduct contrary to the best interest of the public, as deleted text begin such conduct isdeleted text end defined deleted text begin by the rules of the boarddeleted text end new text begin in Minnesota Rules, part 3100.6200new text end ; (7) gross immorality; (8) any physical, mental, emotional, or other disability which adversely affects a dentist's, dental therapist's, dental hygienist's, or dental assistant's ability to perform the service for which the person is licensed; (9) revocation or suspension of a license or equivalent authority to practice, or other disciplinary action or denial of a license application taken by a licensing or credentialing authority of another state, territory, or country as evidenced by a certified copy of the licensing authority's order, if the disciplinary action or application denial was based on facts that would provide a basis for disciplinary action under this chapter and if the action was taken only after affording the credentialed person or applicant notice and opportunity to refute the allegations or pursuant to stipulation or other agreement; (10) failure to maintain adequate safety and sanitary conditions for a dental office in accordance with the standards established by the rules of the board; (11) employing, assisting, or enabling in any manner an unlicensed person to practice dentistry; (12) failure or refusal to attend, testify, and produce records as directed by the board under subdivision 7; (13) violation of, or failure to comply with, any other provisions of sections 150A.01 to 150A.12, the rules of the Board of Dentistry, or any disciplinary order issued by the board, sections 144.291 to 144.298 or 595.02, subdivision 1, paragraph (d), or for any other just cause related to the practice of dentistry. Suspension, revocation, modification or limitation of any license shall not be based upon any judgment as to therapeutic or monetary value of any individual drug prescribed or any individual treatment rendered, but only upon a repeated pattern of conduct; (14) knowingly providing false or misleading information that is directly related to the care of that patient unless done for an accepted therapeutic purpose such as the administration of a placebo; or (15) aiding suicide deleted text begin ordeleted text end new text begin ,new text end aiding attempted suicide deleted text begin in violation ofdeleted text end new text begin , being subject to injunctive relief, or being assessed civil damages according tonew text end section 609.215 as established by any of the following: (i) a copy of the record of criminal conviction or plea of guilty for a felony in violation of section 609.215, subdivision 1 or 2; (ii) a copy of the record of a judgment of contempt of court for violating an injunction issued under section 609.215, subdivision 4; (iii) a copy of the record of a judgment assessing damages under section 609.215, subdivision 5; or (iv) a finding by the board that the person violated section 609.215, subdivision 1 or 2. The board shall investigate any complaint of a violation of section 609.215, subdivision 1 or 2. Sec. 18. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 150A.081, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Access to data on licensee. When the board has probable cause to believe that a licensee's condition meets a ground listed in section 150A.08, subdivision 1, clause deleted text begin (4) ordeleted text end (8), it may, notwithstanding sections 13.384, 144.651, or any other law limiting access to medical data, obtain medical or health records on the licensee without the licensee's consent. The medical data may be requested from a provider, as defined in section 144.291, subdivision 2, paragraph (h), an insurance company, or a government agency. A provider, insurance company, or government agency shall comply with a written request of the board under this subdivision and is not liable in any action for damages for releasing the data requested by the board if the data are released under the written request, unless the information is false and the entity providing the information knew, or had reason to believe, the information was false. Sec. 19. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 150A.091, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Application and initial license or registration fees. Each applicant shall submit with a license, advanced dental therapist certificate, or deleted text begin permitdeleted text end new text begin registrationnew text end application a nonrefundable fee in the following amounts in order to administratively process an application: (1) dentist, $308; (2) full faculty dentist, $308; (3) limited faculty dentist, $140; (4) resident dentist or dental provider, $55; (5) advanced dental therapist, $100; (6) dental therapist, $220; (7) dental hygienist, $115; (8) licensed dental assistant, $115; (9) dental assistant with limited radiology registration as described in Minnesota Rules, part 3100.1320, $27; and (10) guest license, $50. Sec. 20. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 150A.091, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Annual license renewal fees. Each deleted text begin limited faculty or resident dentistdeleted text end new text begin applicantnew text end shall submit with an annual license renewal application a fee established by the board not to exceed the following amounts: (1) limited faculty dentist, $168; deleted text begin anddeleted text end (2) resident dentist or dental provider, $85deleted text begin .deleted text end new text begin ; andnew text end new text begin (3) guest license, $50. new text end Sec. 21. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 150A.091, subdivision 5, is amended to read: Subd. 5. Biennial license or registration renewal fees. Each of the following applicants shall submit with a biennial license or deleted text begin permitdeleted text end new text begin registrationnew text end renewal application a fee as established by the board, not to exceed the following amounts: (1) dentist or full faculty dentist, $475; (2) dental therapist, $300; (3) dental hygienist, $200; (4) licensed dental assistant, $150; and (5) dental assistant with a limited radiology registration as described in Minnesota Rules, part 3100.1320, $24. Sec. 22. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 150A.091, subdivision 7, is amended to read: Subd. 7. Biennial license or deleted text begin permitdeleted text end new text begin registrationnew text end late fee. Applications for renewal of any license or deleted text begin permitdeleted text end new text begin registrationnew text end received after the time specified in Minnesota Rules, part 3100.1700, must be assessed a late fee equal to 25 percent of the biennial renewal fee. Sec. 23. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 150A.091, subdivision 8, is amended to read: Subd. 8. Duplicate deleted text begin license ordeleted text end new text begin renewalnew text end certificate new text begin or registration new text end fee. Each applicant shall submit, with a request for issuance of a duplicate deleted text begin of the original license, or of andeleted text end annual or biennial renewal certificate for a license or deleted text begin permitdeleted text end new text begin registrationnew text end , a fee in the following amounts: deleted text begin (1) original dentist, full faculty dentist, dental therapist, dental hygiene, or dental assistant license, $35; and deleted text end deleted text begin (2)deleted text end new text begin (1)new text end annual or biennial renewal certificates, $10deleted text begin .deleted text end new text begin ; andnew text end new text begin (2) biennial renewal registration, $10. new text end Sec. 24. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 150A.091, subdivision 9a, is amended to read: Subd. 9a. Credential review; nonaccredited dental deleted text begin institutiondeleted text end new text begin education programnew text end . Applicants who have graduated from a nonaccredited dental deleted text begin collegedeleted text end new text begin education programnew text end desiring licensure as a dentist pursuant to section 150A.06, subdivision 1, shall submit an application for credential review and an application fee not to exceed the amount of $200. Sec. 25. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 150A.091, subdivision 10, is amended to read: Subd. 10. Reinstatement fee. No dentist, dental therapist, dental hygienist, or dental assistant whose license has been suspended or revoked may have the license reinstated or a new license issued until a fee has been submitted to the board in the following amounts: (1) dentist, $140; (2) dental therapist, $85; (3) dental hygienist, $55; deleted text begin anddeleted text end (4) dental assistant, $35deleted text begin .deleted text end new text begin ; andnew text end new text begin (5) dental assistant with a limited radiology registration, $24. new text end Sec. 26. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 150A.091, subdivision 20, is amended to read: Subd. 20. Emeritus active license. An individual applying for emeritus active licensure under section 150A.06, subdivision 11, must pay a fee upon application and upon renewal every two years. The fees for emeritus active license application and new text begin biennial new text end renewal are as follows: dentist, $212; dental therapist, $100; dental hygienist, $75; and dental assistant, $55. Sec. 27. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 150A.091, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 20a. new text end new text begin Emeritus active license late fee. new text end new text begin The board must assess a late fee equal to 25 percent of the biennial renewal fee on applications for renewal of an emeritus active license received after the time specified in Minnesota Rules, part 3100.1350, subpart 3. new text end Sec. 28. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 150A.10, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Dental hygienists. Any licensed dentist, licensed dental therapist, public institution, or deleted text begin schooldeleted text end new text begin education programnew text end authority may obtain services from a licensed dental hygienist. The licensed dental hygienist may provide those services defined in section 150A.05, subdivision 1a. The services provided shall not include the establishment of a final diagnosis or treatment plan for a dental patient. All services shall be provided under supervision of a licensed dentist. Any licensed dentist who shall permit any dental service by a dental hygienist other than those authorized by the Board of Dentistry, shall be deemed to be violating the provisions of sections 150A.01 to 150A.12, and any unauthorized dental service by a dental hygienist shall constitute a violation of sections 150A.01 to 150A.12. Sec. 29. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 150A.10, subdivision 1a, is amended to read: Subd. 1a. Collaborative practice authorization for dental hygienists in community settings. (a) Notwithstanding subdivision 1, a dental hygienist licensed under this chapter may be employed or retained by a health care facility, program, nonprofit organization, or licensed dentist to perform the dental hygiene services listed in Minnesota Rules, part 3100.8700, subpart 1, without the patient first being examined by a licensed dentist if the dental hygienist: (1) has entered into a collaborative agreement with a licensed dentist that designates authorization for the services provided by the dental hygienist; and (2) has documented completion of a course on medical emergencies within each continuing education cycle. (b) A collaborating dentist must be licensed under this chapter and may enter into a collaborative agreement with no more than deleted text begin fourdeleted text end new text begin eightnew text end dental hygienists unless otherwise authorized by the board. The board shall develop parameters and a process for obtaining authorization to collaborate with more than deleted text begin fourdeleted text end new text begin eightnew text end dental hygienists. The collaborative agreement must include: (1) consideration for medically compromised patients and medical conditions for which a dental evaluation and treatment plan must occur prior to the provision of dental hygiene services; (2) age- and procedure-specific standard collaborative practice protocols, including recommended intervals for the performance of dental hygiene services and a period of time in which an examination by a dentist should occur; (3) copies of consent to treatment form provided to the patient by the dental hygienist; (4) specific protocols for the placement of pit and fissure sealants and requirements for follow-up care to ensure efficacy; and (5) the procedure for creating and maintaining dental records for patients who are treated by the dental hygienist under Minnesota Rules, part 3100.9600, including specifying where records will be located. (c) The collaborative agreement must be: (1) signed and maintained by the dentist; the dental hygienist; and the facility, program, or organization; (2) reviewed annually by the collaborating dentist and the dental hygienist; and (3) made available to the board upon request. (d) Before performing any services authorized under this subdivision, a dental hygienist must provide the patient with a consent to treatment form which must include a statement advising the patient that the dental hygiene services provided are not a substitute for a dental examination by a licensed dentist. When the patient requires a referral for additional dental services, the dental hygienist shall complete a referral form and provide a copy to the patient, the facility, if applicable, the dentist to whom the patient is being referred, and the collaborating dentist, if specified in the collaborative agreement. A copy of the referral form shall be maintained in the patient's health care record. The patient does not become a new patient of record of the dentist to whom the patient was referred until the dentist accepts the patient for follow-up services after referral from the dental hygienist. (e) For the purposes of this subdivision, a "health care facility, program, or nonprofit organization" includes a hospital; nursing home; home health agency; group home serving the elderly, disabled, or juveniles; state-operated facility licensed by the commissioner of human services or the commissioner of corrections; a state-agency-administered public health program or event; and federal, state, or local public health facility, community clinic, tribal clinic, deleted text begin schooldeleted text end new text begin education programnew text end authority, Head Start program, or nonprofit organization that serves individuals who are uninsured or who are Minnesota health care public program recipients. (f) For purposes of this subdivision, a "collaborative agreement" means a written agreement with a licensed dentist who authorizes and accepts responsibility for the services performed by the dental hygienist. (g) A collaborative practice dental hygienist must be reimbursed for all services performed through a health care facility, program, nonprofit organization, or licensed dentist. Sec. 30. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 150A.10, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Restorative procedures. (a) Notwithstanding subdivisions 1, 1a, and 2, a licensed dental hygienist or licensed dental assistant may perform the following restorative procedures: (1) place, contour, and adjust amalgam restorations; (2) place, contour, and adjust glass ionomer; (3) adapt and cement stainless steel crowns; and (4) place, contour, and adjust deleted text begin class I, II, and V supragingivaldeleted text end composite restorations deleted text begin on primary and permanent dentitiondeleted text end . (b) The restorative procedures described in paragraph (a) may be performed only if: (1) the licensed dental hygienist or licensed dental assistant has completed a board-approved course on the specific procedures; (2) the board-approved course includes a component that sufficiently prepares the licensed dental hygienist or licensed dental assistant to adjust the occlusion on the newly placed restoration; (3) a licensed dentist or licensed advanced dental therapist has authorized the procedure to be performed; and (4) a licensed dentist or licensed advanced dental therapist is available in the clinic while the procedure is being performed. (c) The dental faculty who teaches the educators of the board-approved courses specified in paragraph (b) must have prior experience teaching these procedures in an accredited dental education program. Sec. 31. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 150A.105, subdivision 8, is amended to read: Subd. 8. Definitions. (a) For the purposes of this section, the following definitions apply. (b) "Practice settings that serve the low-income and underserved" mean: (1) critical access dental provider settings as designated by the commissioner of human services under section 256B.76, subdivision 4; (2) dental hygiene collaborative practice settings identified in section 150A.10, subdivision 1a, paragraph (e), and including medical facilities, assisted living facilities, federally qualified health centers, and organizations eligible to receive a community clinic grant under section 145.9268, subdivision 1; (3) military and veterans administration hospitals, clinics, and care settings; (4) a patient's residence or home when the patient is home-bound or receiving or eligible to receive home care services or home and community-based waivered services, regardless of the patient's income; (5) oral health educational institutions; or (6) any other clinic or practice setting, including mobile dental units, in which at least 50 percent of the total patient base of the dental therapist or advanced dental therapist consists of patients who: (i) are enrolled in a Minnesota health care program; (ii) have a medical disability or chronic condition that creates a significant barrier to receiving dental care;new text begin ornew text end deleted text begin (iii) do not have dental health coverage, either through a public health care program or private insurance, and have an annual gross family income equal to or less than 200 percent of the federal poverty guidelines; or deleted text end deleted text begin (iv)deleted text end new text begin (iii)new text end do not have dental health coverage, either through a state public health care program or private insurance, and whose family new text begin annual new text end gross income is equal to or less than 200 percent of the federal poverty guidelines. (c) "Dental health professional shortage area" means an area that meets the criteria established by the secretary of the United States Department of Health and Human Services and is designated as such under United States Code, title 42, section 254e. Sec. 32. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 150A.106, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Practice limitation. (a) An advanced practice dental therapist shall not perform any service or procedure described in subdivision 2 except as authorized by the collaborating dentist. (b) An advanced dental therapist may perform nonsurgical extractions of periodontally diseased permanent teeth with tooth mobility of +3 to +4 under general supervision if authorized in advance by the collaborating dentist. The advanced dental therapist shall not extract a tooth for any patient if the tooth is unerupted, impacted, fractured, or needs to be sectioned for removal. deleted text begin (c) The collaborating dentist is responsible for directly providing or arranging for another dentist or specialist to provide any necessary advanced services needed by the patient. deleted text end deleted text begin (d)deleted text end new text begin (c)new text end An advanced dental therapist in accordance with the collaborative management agreement must refer patients to another qualified dental or health care professional to receive any needed services that exceed the scope of practice of the advanced dental therapist. deleted text begin (e)deleted text end new text begin (d)new text end In addition to the collaborative management agreement requirements described in section 150A.105, a collaborative management agreement entered into with an advanced dental therapist must include specific written protocols to govern situations in which the advanced dental therapist encounters a patient who requires treatment that exceeds the authorized scope of practice of the advanced dental therapist. The collaborating dentist must ensure that a dentist is available to the advanced dental therapist for timely consultation during treatment if needed and must either provide or arrange with another dentist or specialist to provide the necessary treatment to any patient who requires more treatment than the advanced dental therapist is authorized to provide. Sec. 33. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 150A.11, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Unlawful practice. It is unlawful for any person to: enable an unlicensed person to practice dentistry; to practice or attempt to practice dentistry without a license; to practice dentistry under the name of a corporation or company; or to practice under any name that may tend to deceive the public or imply professional superiority to or greater skill than that possessed by another dentist. If a dentist practices under the dentist's own name, any public display or cards shall include the initials of the dentist's dental degree, such as D.D.S. or D.M.D., following the name. If a dentist practices under another name, the name shall include some designation which makes clear that the person is practicing dentistry or a specialty of dentistry; and that the names of all of the participating dentists practicing under the name be clearly identified on letterheads and building or office signs that display a name other than the dentist's own name. Any communication between dentist and patient shall clearly indicate the name of the dentist treating the patient. The board may promulgate rules regarding the name under which a dentist may practice. No corporation shall practice dentistry or engage in it, or hold itself out as being entitled to practice dentistry, or furnish dental services or dentists, or advertise under or assume the title of dentists or dental surgeons or equivalent title. No corporation shall furnish dental advice, or advertise or hold itself out with any other person or alone, that it has or owns a dental office or can furnish dental service, dentists, or dental surgeons, or solicit, through itself, or its agents, officers, employees, directors or trustees, dental patronage for any dentist or dental surgeon. This section: (1) Does not apply to any licensee while acting as an instructor in or under the University of Minnesota, the Mayo Foundation, or any other deleted text begin schooldeleted text end new text begin education programnew text end in the state recognized by the state Board of Dentistry; (2) Does not prohibit dentists from incorporating their practice of dentistry for business purposes under the special provisions of a corporate practice act for dentistry; (3) Shall not be construed to change or amend the right of licensed dentists to provide dental care under any form of organization that is lawful under the laws of this state, or to contract to sell their services in any manner that is lawful under the laws of this state. Sec. 34. new text begin REPEALER.new text end new text begin Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 150A.06, subdivision 6, new text end new text begin is repealed. new text end APPENDIX Repealed Minnesota Statutes: S3559-1 150A.06 LICENSURE. Subd. 6. Display of name and certificates. (a) The renewal certificate of every licensee or registrant must be conspicuously displayed in plain sight of patients in every office in which that person practices. Duplicate renewal certificates may be obtained from the board. (b) Near or on the entrance door to every office where dentistry is practiced, the name of each dentist practicing there, as inscribed on the current license certificate, must be displayed in plain sight. (c) The board must allow the display of a mini-license for guest license holders performing volunteer dental services. There is no fee for the mini-license for guest volunteers.